Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4704
Rights of child; requirements for a driver's license.

(1) Every child placed by the department in a foster family home or child-care institution shall be entitled to access to reasonable opportunities to participate in age or developmentally appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.

(2) A child in foster care shall not be required, by virtue of his or her status as a child in foster care, to meet any more requirements for a driver's license under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act than any other child applying for the same license.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB225, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB219, § 2.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.